Washington statutes.
RCW 43.376.050

Meetings with statewide elected officials and tribal leaders—List of contact information.

(1) At least once a year, the governor and other statewide elected officials must meet with leaders of Indian tribes to address issues of mutual concern.

(2) The governor must maintain for public reference an updated list of the names and contact information for the individuals designated as tribal liaisons and the names and contact information for tribal leadership as submitted by an Indian tribe.

[ 2012 c 122 s 5.]